California, session 20252026, SB425.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 995.450 is added to the Code of Civil Procedure, to read:995.450. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, if a statute provides for a bond to be given to or in favor of a beneficiary that is a public entity, as defined in Section 1100 of the Public Contract Code, in connection with the purchase, construction, expansion, improvement, or rehabilitation of any real or other tangible personal property, that bond is not effective unless, before the surety or principal assumes any liability, the beneficiary agrees to do both of the following:(1) Make all payments to the principal, or to the surety if the surety agrees to complete the work upon the principal’s default, pursuant to the terms of the contract.(2) Perform all necessary obligations owed to the principal under the contract.(b) For purposes of this section, “contract” means a written or oral contract, as defined in Section 1549 of the Civil Code, that obligates a principal to purchase, construct, expand, improve, or rehabilitate real or other tangible personal property.SECTION 1.Section 662 of the Insurance Code is amended to read:662.(a)(1)A notice of cancellation of a policy shall not be effective unless mailed or delivered by the insurer to the named insured, lienholder, or additional interest at least 30 days prior to the effective date of cancellation. However, when cancellation is for nonpayment of premium, at least 10 days’ notice of cancellation after nonpayment of premium due by the specified due date accompanied by the reason for the cancellation shall be given. Unless the reason accompanies or is included in the notice of cancellation, the notice of cancellation shall state or be accompanied by a statement that upon written request of the named insured, mailed or delivered to the insurer not less than 15 days prior to the effective date of cancellation, the insurer will specify the reason for the cancellation.(2)A cancellation based on nonpayment of premium shall only be effective on the date specified in the notice if the insured has not cured the nonpayment of premium due identified in the notice by the end of the 10-day period.(b)This section shall not apply to nonrenewal.(c)Notices made to lienholders pursuant to this section may be done electronically with the consent of the lienholder.